en: Wheat germ
bg: Пшеничен зародиш
es: Germen de trigo
fr: Germe de blé
hr: Pšenične klice
ja: 小麦胚芽
lt: Kviečių gemalai
nl: Tarwekiemen

en: Cereal semolinas, Suji, Sooji
de: Grieße, Grieß
es: Sémolas y semolinas de cereales, Sémolas de cereales
fi: viljakasvit
fr: Semoules de céréales
hr: Žitne krupice
it: Semolino di cereali
ja: セモリナ
lt: Javų manų kruopos
nl: Griesmelen

en: Corn semolinas, Maize semolinas
bg: Царевичен грис
de: Maisgrieße, Maisgrieß
es: Sémolas de maíz, Sémola de maíz, Harina de maiz
fi: Maissisuurimot
fr: Semoules de maïs
hr: Kukuruzni griz
it: Semolino di mais
lt: Kukurūzų manų kruopos
nl: Maïsgriesmelen

en: Corn semolinas for polenta, Maize semolinas for polenta, Pre-cooked corn meal for polenta
de: Maisgrieße für Polenta, Maisgrieß für Polenta
es: Sémolas de maíz para polenta, Sémola de maíz precocida para polenta
fr: Semoules de maïs pour polenta, Semoule de maïs précuite pour polenta
hr: Kukuruzni griz za palentu
it: Semolino di mais per polenta
nl: Polentamaïsgriesmelen

en: Dried pre-cooked polenta semolina, Dried pre-cooked maize semolina, Dried pre-cooked corn semolina
fr: Polenta précuite sèche, Semoule de maïs précuite sèche

en: Unsalted polenta, Cooked unsalted maize semolina
fr: Polenta non salée, Semoule de maïs cuite non salée

en: Rice semolinas
bg: Оризов грис
de: Reisgrieße, Reisgrieß
es: Sémolas de arroz, Sémola de arroz
fr: Semoules de riz
hr: Rižin griz
lt: Ryžių manų kruopos
nl: Rijstgriesmelen

en: Wheat semolinas
bg: Пшеничен грис
de: Weizengrieße, Weizengrieß
es: Sémolas y semolinas de trigo, Sémolas de trigo, Sémola de trigo
fi: Vehnäsuurimot
fr: Semoules de blé, semoules
hr: Pšenični griz
it: Semole di grano
lt: Kviečių manų kruopos
nl: Tarwegriesmelen

en: Durum wheat semolinas, durum wheat semolina
de: Hartweizengrieße, Hartweizengrieß
es: Sémolas y semolinas de trigo duro, Sémolas de trigo duro, Sémola de trigo duro
fi: Durumvehnäsuurimot
fr: Semoules de blé dur
hr: Griz od durum pšenice
it: Semole di grano duro
ja: デュラムセモリナ
nl: Harde tarwegriesmelen

en: Durum wheat semolinas for couscous, Couscous
bg: Кускус
de: Hartweizengrieße für Couscous, Hartweizengrieß für Couscous
es: Sémolas de trigo duro para couscous, Cuscús
fr: Semoules de blé dur pour couscous, Couscous
hr: Griz od durum pšenice za kus-kus, Kuskus
it: Semolino di grano duro per couscous
ja: クスクス
lt: Kuskusas
nl: Couscous griesmelen van harde tarwe, Harde tarwe griesmelen voor couscous

en: Pre-cooked durum wheat whole grain to pan-fry
fr: Blé dur précuit en grains entiers à poêler

en: Pre-cooked durum wheat in a microwaveable bag
fr: Blé dur précuit en sachet micro-ondable

en: Unsalted pre-cooked durum wheat with whole grain
fr: Blé dur précuit non salé en grains entiers

en: Soft wheat semolinas, Soft wheat farina
de: Weichweizengrieße, Weichweizengrieß
es: Sémolas y semolinas de trigo blando, Sémolas de trigo blando, Sémola de trigo blando
fr: Semoules de blé tendre
hr: Griz od meke pšenice
nl: Zachte tarwegriesmelen

en: Frik, Crushed immature durum wheat
fr: Frik, Blé dur immature concassé

en: Cooked unsalted frik, Cooked unsalted crushed immature durum wheat
fr: Frik cuit non salé, Blé dur immature concassé cuit non salé

en: Whole durum wheat
fr: Blé dur entier

en: Pre-cooked whole wheat
fr: Blé dur précuit entier

en: Potato starches
bg: Картофено нишесте
da: Kartoffelstivelser
fr: Fécules de pomme de terre, Fécule de pomme de terre
hr: Škrobovi krumpira
ja: 馬鈴薯デンプン
lt: Bulvių krakmolas
nl: Aardappelzetmelen
sv: Potatisstärkelser

en: Tapioca
fr: Tapioca, Tapioca cru, Perles du Japon crues, Perles du Japon
hr: Tapioka
ja: タピオカ
pt: Tapioca